Louisiana, session 2026, SB66.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart I of Part III of Chapter 1 of Code Title V of Code Book I of Title
9 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 9:360 through 360.1, is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
SUBPART I. MEDICAL EXPERT TESTIMONY
§360. Medical expert testimony; priority for trial
In any proceeding in which a medical expert has been subpoenaed to
testify based upon allegations of abuse or neglect of a child, the court shall take
the testimony of the medical expert in priority to the parties and other
witnesses, absent extenuating circumstances that would prohibit this procedure.
The court shall take the testimony of the medical expert for all purposes by
which the medical expert's appearance is responsive to a subpoena.
§360.1. Applicability
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 66 ENROLLED
The provisions of this Subpart shall apply to child custody proceedings
pursuant to Title V of the Civil Code and child in need of care proceedings
pursuant to Title VI of the Children's Code.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.